Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1502
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections
37-1501 to 37-1510:

(1) Deer means
any wild deer legally taken in Nebraska and deer confiscated as legal evidence
if the confiscated carcass is considered by a conservation officer to be in
good condition for donation under the program;

(2) Field dressed means
properly bled and cleaned of the internal organs;

(3) Meat processor means
any business that is licensed to process meat for retail customers by the
Department of Agriculture, the United States Department of Agriculture, or
a neighboring state's department that is similar to Nebraska's; and

(4) Program
means the deer donation program established pursuant to sections 37-1501 to
37-1510.

Laws 2012, LB928, § 6.